Utah statutes.
53-2a-305.   Agreements not affected by this part.

Nothing in this part may be construed:

(1)  to limit the state, a county, municipality, local district, special service district, or interlocal entity from entering into an agreement allowed by law for public safety and related purposes; or

(2)  to affect an agreement to which the state, a county, municipality, local district, special service district, or interlocal entity is a party.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

